Maryland, session 2025, SB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
2–1303.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through 2–1302.4 of this
subtitle, the Comptroller shall pay:

SENATE BILL 1043 3
(1) revenues from the hotel surcharge into the Dorchester County
Economic Development Fund established under § 10–130 of the Economic Development
Article;
(2) REVENUES FROM THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND
SURCHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–102(C) OF THIS ARTICLE INTO THE
TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–216 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
[(2)] (3) to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under
§ 5–206 of the Education Article, the following percentage of the remaining sales and use
tax revenues:
(i) for fiscal year 2023, 9.2%;
(ii) for fiscal year 2024, 11.0%;
(iii) for fiscal year 2025, 11.3%;
(iv) for fiscal year 2026, 11.7%; and
(v) for fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12.1%; and
[(3)] (4) the remaining sales and use tax revenue into the General Fund
of the State.
11–102.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a tax is imposed on:
(1) a retail sale in the State; and
(2) a use, in the State, of tangible personal property, a digital code, a digital
product, or a taxable service.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, in addition to the tax
imposed under subsection (a) of this section, a hotel surcharge is imposed in Dorchester
County on the sale of a right to occupy a room or lodgings as a transient guest in an
establishment that offers at least 380 rooms.
(2) The hotel surcharge imposed under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may not be imposed if the Maryland Economic Development Corporation certifies to the
Comptroller that the bonds issued by the Maryland Economic Development Corporation
secured by the Dorchester County Economic Development Fund established under §
10–130 of the Economic Development Article have been paid in full.

SENATE BILL 1043
(c) IN ADDITION TO THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND SURCHARGE IS IMPOSED ON:
(1) A RETAIL SALE IN THE STATE; AND
(2) A USE, IN THE STATE, OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A
DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL PRODUCT, OR A TAXABLE SERVICE.
(D) (1) A county, municipal corporation, special taxing district, or other
political subdivision of the State may not impose any retail sales or use tax except:
(i) a sales tax or use tax that was in effect on January 1, 1971;
(ii) a tax on the sale or use of:
1. fuels;
2. utilities;
3. space rentals; or
4. any controlled dangerous substance, as defined in § 5–101
of the Criminal Law Article, unless the sale is made by a person who registers under and
complies with Title 5, Subtitle 3 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(iii) a tax imposed by a code county on the sale or use of food and
beverages authorized under § 20–602 of the Local Government Article.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection may not be construed as conferring
authority to impose a sales and use tax.
11–104.
(L) THE RATE OF THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND SURCHARGE
IMPOSED UNDER § 11–102(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS 1%.
Article – Transportation
2–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary is responsible for the budget of the Office of the Secretary
and for the budget of each unit in the Department.
(2) (I) The budget request that the Secretary submits for the
Department shall contain, for each modal administration, separate items for:

SENATE BILL 1043 5
[(i)] 1. Capital expenditures; and
[(ii)] 2. [Operating] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, OPERATING expenditures.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE OPERATING EXPENDITURES INCLUDED IN THE BUDGET REQUEST
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR THE MARYLAND
TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION AND THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT
EXCEED THE AMOUNT INCLUDED IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR
INCREASED BY 3%.
2–114.
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION TO
THE DEPARTMENT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO SATISFY THE STATE
MATCHING REQUIREMENT FOR ANY NEW CAPITAL PROJECT INCLUDED IN THE
CURRENT YEAR CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM THAT IS ELIGIBLE
FOR FEDERAL FUNDING.
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Transportation facilities project” includes:
(1) The Susquehanna River Bridge, the Harry W. Nice/Thomas “Mac”
Middleton Potomac River Bridge, the William Preston Lane, Jr. Memorial Chesapeake Bay
Bridge and parallel Chesapeake Bay Bridge, the Baltimore Harbor Tunnel, the Fort
McHenry Tunnel, the Francis Scott Key Bridge, and the John F. Kennedy Memorial
Highway, together with their appurtenant causeways, approaches, interchanges, entrance
plazas, toll stations, and service facilities;
(2) A vehicle parking facility located in a priority funding area as defined
in § 5–7B–02 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
(3) Any other project for transportation facilities that the Authority
authorizes to be acquired or constructed; [and]
(4) Any additions, improvements, or enlargements to any of these projects,
whenever authorized; AND
(5) ANY PROJECT INCLUDED IN THE CURRENT CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 1043
4–204.
(a) Acting on behalf of the Department, the Authority has those powers and
duties relating to the supervision, financing, construction, operation, maintenance, and
repair of transportation facilities projects as are granted to it by this title or any other
provisions of law.
(b) The Authority has general supervision over all transportation facilities
projects.
(c) The Authority shall finance, construct, operate, repair, and maintain in good
order all transportation facilities projects.
4–205.
(a) Subject to § 4–306 of this title and in addition to the powers otherwise
specifically granted by law, the Authority has the powers described in this section.
(F) THE AUTHORITY SHALL IDENTIFY METHODS TO USE PUBLIC–PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIP INVESTMENTS OR TOLL REVENUES TO FUND TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENTS IN THE STATE.
[(f)] (G) The Authority may adopt rules and regulations to carry out the
provisions of this title.
[(g)] (H) The Authority may do anything else necessary or convenient to carry
out the powers granted in this title.
4–312.
(a) (2) As to all or any part of any transportation facilities project, the
Authority may:
(i) Fix, revise, charge, and collect rentals, rates, fees, tolls, and other
charges and revenues for its use or for its services; and
(ii) Contract with any person who desires its use for any purpose and
fix the terms, conditions, rentals, rates, fees, tolls, or other charges or revenues for this use.
7–205.
(a) In this section, “state of good repair needs” includes the capital needs
identified by the Administration in the assessment required under § 7–309 of this article.
(b) For fiscal year 2020, the Governor shall include in the State budget an
appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation of the Administration

SENATE BILL 1043 7
that is equal to the appropriation for the operation of the Administration in the fiscal year
2019 State budget as introduced, increased by at least 4.4%.
(c) For fiscal year 2021, the Governor shall include in the State budget an
appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation of the Administration
that is equal to the appropriation for the operation of the Administration in the State
budget for the immediately preceding fiscal year, increased by at least 4.4%.
(d) For each of fiscal years 2023 through 2029, the Governor shall include in the
State budget an appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation of the
Administration that may not be less than the fiscal year 2022 appropriation for the
operation of the Administration.
(e) For fiscal year 2022, the Governor shall include in the State budget an
appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation of the Administration
that may not be less than the fiscal year 2021 appropriation for the operation of the
Administration.
(f) (1) For each of fiscal years 2020 through 2022, the Governor shall include
in the State budget an appropriation for the capital needs of the Administration of at least
$29,100,000 from the revenues available for the State capital program in the
Transportation Trust Fund.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Governor shall include
in the State budget an appropriation for the state of good repair needs of the Administration
in the following amounts from the revenues available for the State capital program in the
Transportation Trust Fund:
(i) For fiscal year 2023, at least $402,037,183;
(ii) For fiscal year 2024, at least $502,081,501;
(iii) For fiscal year 2025, at least $450,000,000;
(iv) For fiscal year 2026, at least $450,000,000;
(v) For fiscal year 2027, at least $450,000,000;
(vi) For fiscal year 2028, at least $450,000,000; and
(vii) For fiscal year 2029, at least $318,558,000.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, an appropriation
required under paragraph (2) of this subsection may be reduced if the total appropriation
for state of good repair needs in a prior fiscal year exceeded the amount specified under
paragraph (2) of this subsection for that fiscal year.

SENATE BILL 1043
(ii) A reduction authorized under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph:
1. May be applied only to one fiscal year; and
2. May not exceed the difference between the total
appropriation for state of good repair needs for the prior fiscal year and the amount
specified under paragraph (2) of this subsection for that fiscal year.
(4) (i) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection may not supplant any other capital funding otherwise available for the
Administration.
(ii) The appropriations required under paragraph (2) of this
subsection shall be in addition to any funds appropriated for the capital planning,
engineering, right–of–way acquisition, or construction of the Purple Line in Montgomery
County and Prince George’s County.
(G) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE STATE BUDGET AN APPROPRIATION OF AT
LEAST $400,000,000 FROM THE REVENUES AVAILABLE FOR THE STATE CAPITAL
PROGRAM IN THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND FOR THE FOLLOWING NEEDS NOT
PRIORITIZED UNDER THE CURRENT CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM:
(I) STATE OF GOOD REPAIR NEEDS OF THE ADMINISTRATION;
(II) THE CAPITAL PLANNING, ENGINEERING, RIGHT–OF–WAY
ACQUISITION, OR CONSTRUCTION OF THE PROPOSED RED LINE IN BALTIMORE CITY
AND BALTIMORE COUNTY; AND
(III) ANY OTHER TRANSIT PROJECT.
(2) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL
URBAN CONSUMERS” MEANS THE INDEX PUBLISHED MONTHLY BY THE BUREAU OF
LABOR STATISTICS OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR THAT IS THE U.S. CITY
AVERAGE OF ALL ITEMS IN A BASKET OF CONSUMER GOODS AND SERVICES.
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS SHALL BE DETERMINED BY COMPARING THE
AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE PRECEDING JUNE 30
TO THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE PRIOR 12 MONTHS.
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE APPROPRIATIONS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS

SENATE BILL 1043 9
SUBSECTION SHALL BE INCREASED BY THE AMOUNT THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT
OF MULTIPLYING:
1. THE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO
BE INCLUDED IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR; AND
2. THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS.
[(g)] (H) This Act may not be construed to limit the authority of the
Administrator to use available funds appropriated to the Administration to increase the
State investment in locally operated transit agencies.
7–309.
(a) The Administration shall, at least every 3 years, assess the ongoing,
unconstrained capital needs of the Administration.
(b) In undertaking the assessment required under subsection (a) of this section,
the Administration shall:
(1) Compile and prioritize capital needs without regard to cost;
(2) Identify the backlog of repairs and replacements needed to achieve a
state of good repair for all Administration assets, including a separate analysis of these
needs over the following 10 years; [and]
(3) Identify the needs to be met in order to enhance service and achieve
system performance goals; AND
(4) IDENTIFY THE NEEDS TO BE MET IN ORDER TO ACHIEVE GOALS
RELATED TO MAINTENANCE NEEDS AND STATE OF GOOD REPAIR NEEDS THAT ARE
NOT FUNDED UNDER THE CURRENT CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
WITHIN THE ADMINISTRATION.
(c) On or before July 1, 2019, and on or before July 1 every 3 years thereafter, the
Administration shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, submit
the assessment required under subsection (a) of this section to the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Environment
and Transportation Committee.
(d) On or before January 20, 2022, and on or before January 20 each year
thereafter, the Administration shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, submit an accounting of the capital funds programmed, appropriated, and
expended on each of the projects identified in the assessment required under subsection (a)
of this section for the prior fiscal year to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the

SENATE BILL 1043
House Appropriations Committee, and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee.
8–209.
(A) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL, AT LEAST EVERY 3 YEARS, ASSESS
THE ONGOING, UNCONSTRAINED NEEDS OF THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) IN UNDERTAKING THE ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) COMPILE AND PRIORITIZE CAPITAL NEEDS WITHOUT
REGARD TO COST; AND
(II) IDENTIFY THE BACKLOG OF REPAIRS AND REPLACEMENTS
NEEDED TO ACHIEVE A STATE OF GOOD REPAIR FOR ALL ADMINISTRATION ASSETS,
INCLUDING A SEPARATE ANALYSIS OF THE NEEDS OVER THE FOLLOWING 10 YEARS.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EVERY
3 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, SUBMIT THE ASSESSMENT
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE SENATE BUDGET
AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE
HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE.
(B) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “STATE OF GOOD REPAIR NEEDS” INCLUDES
THE CAPITAL NEEDS IDENTIFIED BY THE ADMINISTRATION IN THE ASSESSMENT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE STATE BUDGET AN APPROPRIATION FROM
THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND FOR:
(I) THE CAPITAL NEEDS OF THE ADMINISTRATION THAT
EQUALS OR EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT OF CAPITAL FUNDING FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION INCLUDED IN THE FISCAL YEAR 2024 STATE BUDGET AS ENACTED
BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
(II) THE STATE OF GOOD REPAIR NEEDS OF THE
ADMINISTRATION AND BRIDGE REPLACEMENT PROJECTS THAT ARE NOT INCLUDED
IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL
YEAR THAT EQUALS OR EXCEEDS $400,000,000.

SENATE BILL 1043 11
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL
URBAN CONSUMERS” MEANS THE INDEX PUBLISHED MONTHLY BY THE BUREAU OF
LABOR STATISTICS OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR THAT IS THE U.S. CITY
AVERAGE OF ALL ITEMS IN A BASKET OF CONSUMER GOODS AND SERVICES.
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS SHALL BE DETERMINED BY COMPARING THE
AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE PRECEDING JUNE 30
TO THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE PRIOR 12 MONTHS.
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE APPROPRIATIONS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE INCREASED BY THE AMOUNT THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT
OF MULTIPLYING:
1. THE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO
BE INCLUDED IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR; AND
2. THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS.
10–205.
(H) (1) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2032, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION FOR THE PURPOSES
SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION OF $160,000,000 FROM
THE REVENUES AVAILABLE FOR THE STATE CAPITAL PROGRAM IN THE
TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE AN ANNUAL GRANT OF AT
LEAST $160,000,000 TO THE WASHINGTON SUBURBAN TRANSIT DISTRICT TO PAY
THE CAPITAL COSTS OF THE WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT
AUTHORITY’S DMVMOVES CAPITAL INVESTMENT INITIATIVE.
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL
URBAN CONSUMERS” MEANS THE INDEX PUBLISHED MONTHLY BY THE BUREAU OF
LABOR STATISTICS OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR THAT IS THE U.S. CITY
AVERAGE OF ALL ITEMS IN A BASKET OF CONSUMER GOODS AND SERVICES.
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS SHALL BE DETERMINED BY COMPARING THE
AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE PRECEDING JUNE 30
TO THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE PRIOR 12 MONTHS.

SENATE BILL 1043
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE APPROPRIATION AND GRANT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPHS
(1) AND (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE INCREASED BY THE AMOUNT THAT
EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING:
1. THE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO
BE INCLUDED IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR; AND
2. THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS.
Chapter 351 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapters 11 and 20 of the Acts of
the 2021 Special Session
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 4 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2018. [Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for
a period of 11 years and 1 month and, at the end of June 30, 2029, Section 2 of this Act,
with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.]
Chapter 352 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapters 11 and 20 of the Acts of
the 2021 Special Session
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 4 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2018. [Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for
a period of 11 years and 1 month and, at the end of June 30, 2029, Section 2 of this Act,
with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the Department of Transportation shall submit a report to the Governor and, subject
to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly identifying the cost
savings from delaying any new transit projects administered by each modal administration
until maintenance, safety, and state of good repair needs for those projects are met.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.